District of Columbia statutes.
50-2505

Oaths; financial disclosure statement.

Before entering upon the discharge of the duties of office, each member of the Board shall take an oath that he or she will faithfully execute the duties of office according to the laws of the District. Each member shall also take and subscribe to an oath or affirmation that the member has no pecuniary interest, voluntarily or involuntarily, directly or indirectly, in any firm, partnership, association, or corporation engaged in any activity related to a parking facility in the District. Each member shall file annually a financial disclosure statement pursuant to District laws pertaining to the disclosure of financial interests.

History

Aug. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-153, § 6, 41 DCR 4652

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-845.